Washington statutes.
RCW 18.06.060

Approval of educational programs.

The department shall consider for approval any school or program that meets the requirements outlined in this chapter and provides the training required under RCW 18.06.050. Clinical and didactic training may be approved as separate programs or as a joint program. The process for approval shall be established by the secretary by rule.

[ 2019 c 308 s 6; 1991 c 3 s 8; 1985 c 326 s 6.]

NOTES:

Findings—2019 c 308: See note following RCW 18.06.010.